Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2619
Nonresident consultant; applicant; examination.

Any nonresident applicant whose resident state does not license insurance consultants may qualify for a license as a nonresident consultant in this state only upon examination, except as provided in section 44-2625.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 14.